Hawaii statutes.
[§425E-118] Consent and proxies of
partners. Action requiring the consent of partners under this
chapter may be taken without a meeting, and a partner may appoint a proxy to
consent or otherwise act for the partner by signing an appointment record, either
personally or by the partner's attorney in fact. [L 2003, c 210, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next